Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 4

Alcoholic Beverages Generally — Permits

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Cross References.

Beer permits, §§3-5-206,3-5-1303.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on it passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-4-101. Permit required.

(a)

Vinous (except wines), spirituous, or malt liquors or hard cider shall not be manufactured in this state for storage or sale at retail within the state without a permit issued by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(b)

A person shall not sell vinous, spirituous, or malt liquors or hard cider in this state, except as provided in this act. However, the provisions of this act shall not apply to the manufacture, sale, and distribution of wines in this state.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 14105; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-302; 2019, No. 691, § 3.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 1, § 6, provides that the exclusion of wines from the provisions of Acts 1935, No. 108 is intended to exclude only wines or vinous liquors manufactured in the State of Arkansas.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “or hard cider” in (a) and (b); and made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1935, No. 108, codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.

3-4-102. Exhibition of permit.

(a)

Before commencing or doing any business for the time for which a permit has been issued, the permit shall be enclosed in a suitable wood or metal frame having a clear glass space and a substantial wood or metal back so that the whole of the permit may be seen therein. The permit shall be posted upon and at all times displayed in a conspicuous place in the room where the business is carried on, so that all persons visiting the place may readily see it.

(b)

It shall be unlawful for any person holding a permit to post the permit or allow the permit to be posted upon premises other than the premises permitted or upon premises where traffic in beer, wine, or liquor is being carried on by any person other than the permittee or knowingly to deface, destroy, or alter any permit in any respect.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 20; Pope's Dig., § 14125; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-320.

3-4-103. Fiduciaries — Continuation of permitted business.

(a)

If a corporation or copartnership holding a permit under this act shall be dissolved, or if a receiver or assignee for the benefit of creditors is appointed therefor, or if a receiver or assignee for the benefit of creditors or a committee of the property of an individual holding a permit is appointed during the time for which the permit was granted, or if a person holding a permit dies during the term for which the permit was given, then the corporation, copartnership, receiver, or assignee, or the administrator or executor of the estate of the individual, or a committee of the property of a person adjudged to be incompetent may continue to carry on the business upon the premises for a period not to exceed twenty-four (24) months from such date of dissolution or appointment or death. The successors in interest shall be allowed to renew the permit as if the original permittee were still in place and the said successor in interest may operate the said business with the same right and subject to the same restrictions and liabilities as if he or she had been the original applicant for and the original holder of the permit, provided the approval of the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall be first obtained.

(b)

Before continuing the business, the receiver, assignee, individual, or committee shall file a statement setting forth in such form and substance as the director may prescribe by rule the facts and circumstances by which they have succeeded to the rights of the original permittee.

(c)

The director may, in his or her discretion, permit the continuance of the business or may refuse to do so.

(d)

In the event that the director determines to permit the continuance of the business, the permit shall be submitted to the director, and shall have written or stamped across the face of the permit, and signed by the director, the following words:

“(Here insert the name of the person) is permitted to manufacture or sell (as the case may be) malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors, as (here insert the representative capacity, whether as assignee, receiver, executor, administrator, or otherwise) of the original permittee for the unexpired term.”

(e)

For each endorsement, a fee of five dollars ($5.00) shall be paid to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration by the applicant, which shall be paid into the same fund as other permit fees herein provided.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 19; Pope's Dig., § 14124; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-319; Acts 1995, No. 652, § 7; 2019, No. 910, § 3305.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (e).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-4-101.

3-4-104. Sale by fiduciaries or insurers.

(a)

Any person, including an individual, partnership, association, or corporation, not otherwise a licensed dealer in alcoholic beverages, lawfully coming into possession of any alcoholic beverages as executor, administrator, trustee, or other fiduciary, as surety for or in payment of a debt, or as an insurer or its transferees or assigns for the salvage or liquidation of an insured casualty or damage or loss, may sell the beverages in one (1) lot or parcel to a duly licensed wholesale or retail dealer without qualifying as a dealer.

(b)

However, immediately after taking possession of the alcoholic beverages, the person shall register with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and furnish a detailed list of the alcoholic beverages and post with the division a bond, in an amount the division deems sufficient to protect the state from any taxes due on the alcoholic beverages.

(c)

The person shall pay to the division a registration fee of ten dollars ($10.00), which fee shall permit the sale of only the alcoholic beverages detailed in the registration request.

(d)

The fee shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue of the State of Arkansas.

(e)

Whenever any beer is to be sold pursuant to this section, which shall have been involved in a fire, wreck, or similar casualty, then each bottle, can, or container of beer shall be labeled or otherwise identified, under the supervision of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board or its successor, as distress merchandise salvaged from a fire, wreck, or similar casualty.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 463, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-342, 48-343.

3-4-105. Temporary permits.

(a)(1)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may issue a temporary permit for the sale of alcoholic beverages within categories set out in subsection (b) of this section at a function sponsored by or for the benefit of a nonprofit organization or charitable organization.

(2)

A temporary permit issued under this subsection may be issued for a period of time not to exceed five (5) consecutive days.

(3)

An application for a temporary permit issued under this subsection shall meet the requirements as established by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and set out in the application.

(b)(1)

The categories and application fees for temporary permits issued under subsection (a) of this section are as follows:

(A)

Temporary beer permit — Fifty dollars ($50.00) for each event for a temporary permit allowing the sale of beer;

(B)

Temporary wine permit — Fifty dollars ($50.00) for each event for a temporary permit allowing the sale of wine;

(C)

Temporary spirit permit — Fifty dollars ($50.00) for each event for a temporary permit allowing the sale of spirituous alcoholic beverages; and

(D)

Temporary hard cider permit — Fifty dollars ($50.00) for each event for a temporary permit allowing the sale of hard cider.

(2)

A temporary permit issued under subsection (a) of this section is only for on-premises consumption at the event specified in the temporary permit.

(c)

An applicant may apply for one (1) or more of the temporary permits authorized in subsection (a) of this section for an event.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 3; 2019, No. 691, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added (b)(1)(D).

3-4-106. Alcoholic beverage sampling authorized — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “selling unit” means the configuration of an alcoholic beverage intended for sale to consumers, including without limitation:

(1)

A bottle of wine holding seven hundred fifty milliliters (750 ml); and

(2)

A case of beer containing thirty-six (36) cans holding twelve ounces (12 oz) per can.

(b)

A corporation that is publicly traded on a nationally recognized stock exchange that has its principal place of business in Arkansas and is permitted to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises or off-premises consumption in Arkansas and other states may conduct sampling activities in accordance with this section.

(c)(1)

A manufacturer or wholesaler may provide and deliver alcoholic beverages of any type directly to a qualified corporation for the purpose of allowing the corporation to sample the alcoholic beverages to determine whether to offer the alcoholic beverages for sale at one (1) or more of the qualified corporation's business locations either within or outside the state.

(2)

A manufacturer or wholesaler that provides alcoholic beverages under this section is not required to:

(A)

Be authorized to do business in this state; or

(B)

Have any type of license or permit to operate in this state.

(3)

A manufacturer or wholesaler shall not charge the qualified corporation for the alcoholic beverages provided under this section.

(4)

Provision of an alcoholic beverage by a manufacturer or wholesaler under this section is not a gift, gratuity, or inducement to the qualified corporation or any of the qualified corporation's affiliates.

(5)

An alcoholic beverage provided and delivered under this section need not:

(A)

Be available for sale in Arkansas; or

(B)

Possess a brand label approved for sale in this state.

(6)

An alcoholic beverage provided and delivered under this section shall be delivered to an office of the qualified corporation.

(7)

Except for a facility hosting a charitable event, the location to which an alcoholic beverage is provided and delivered under this section shall not be a part of a facility permitted for the on-premises or off-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, an alcoholic beverage provided and delivered under this section shall:

(1)

Be stored in a locked container when not being used for sampling; and

(2)

Not be served to, available to, or handled by a person under twenty-one (21) years of age.

(e)

An employee of a qualified corporation may transport an alcoholic beverage provided under this section to the employee's personal residence or to a facility hosting a charitable event for the purpose of sampling the alcoholic beverage if:

(1)

Sampling of the alcoholic beverage occurs within the employee's personal residence or within a facility hosting a charitable event;

(2)

No person under twenty-one (21) years of age is served, has access to, or handles the alcoholic beverage;

(3)

The alcoholic beverage is not sold; and

(4)

For alcoholic beverages transported to a private residence, no more than one (1) selling unit of each stock-keeping unit of each alcoholic beverage is present at the same time.

(f)

An alcoholic beverage provided and delivered under this subsection shall be sampled only by an employee, a contractor, an immediate family member of the employee or a contractor, an agent of the qualified corporation, a guest visiting the facility of the qualified corporation, or a guest at a charitable event.

(g)

No more than thirty-six (36) selling units of each stock-keeping unit of an alcoholic beverage may be held at the same time by a qualified corporation for sampling purposes or charitable events.

(h)

A qualified corporation shall:

(1)

Not sell an alcoholic beverage provided and delivered under this section; and

(2)

Destroy or safely store any alcoholic beverage remaining at the conclusion of the sampling.

(i)

An alcoholic beverage provided and delivered by a manufacturer or wholesaler under this section is exempt from taxation.

(j)

Providing alcoholic beverages to a qualified corporation in accordance with this section is not a violation of any statute or rule, including a rule requiring a manufacturer or wholesaler to provide the same services to all retailers.

(k)

Owning, possessing, or transporting an alcoholic beverage furnished, or being furnished, to a qualified corporation under this section is not an offense under §3-3-401 et seq.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 304, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Issuance and Terms

Cross References.

Licenses and permits, removal of disqualification for criminal offenses, §17-1-103.

Vinous, spirituous and malt liquors defined, §3-1-102.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

Acts 1937, No. 80, § 3: approved Feb. 13, 1937. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the Arkansas Alcoholic Control Act makes no provision for revenue for second class cities and incorporated towns, and whereas, the control and policing of the sale of liquor in those municipalities is burdensome and expensive, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1983, No. 420, § 3: Mar. 13, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division should be renewable annually no later than August 31; and that this act is immediately necessary to so provide. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 675, § 8: Mar. 22, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division should be authorized to retain ½ of the application permit fees in instances where the permits are denied in order to partially defray the cost of reviewing the permit application and this act is necessary to authorize the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 812, § 4: emergency declared but held unconstitutional in Marshall v. Singleton, 282 Ark. 167, 666 S.W.2d 399 (1984). Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the restriction in the number of permits to dispense vinous (except wines), sprituous and malt liquors is the public policy of the State of Arkansas, and that the continued restriction in the number of permits is in the public interest and advantage.
Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.” March 25, 1983.

Acts 1991, No. 606, § 14: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that numerous persons who are resident aliens of the United States desire to operate establishments that dispense alcoholic beverages in the State of Arkansas and that the same are presently prohibited from obtaining a license in their name. It is further found and determined that the requirement of United States citizenship in order to maintain these establishments poses a burden upon commerce and restricts the number of persons who are able to contribute to the overall economy of the State of Arkansas. It is further found and determined that numerous national corporations are hindered in their operations in that they cannot have newly transferred managers or other key employees assume positions of responsibility within their local outlets since those persons do not meet the two (2) year residency requirement and that such requirement poses an unreasonable burden on the conduct of business in this state as it relates to alcohol beverage outlets. It is further found that the present process of applying for or renewing ABC licenses by requiring proof of payment of personal property taxes is cumbersome, unnecessary, and has no direct relationship to the operation of the ABC permitted outlet. It is further found and determined that there are presently numerous conflicting requirements which are applied to applicants for various retail licenses issued by the state ABC Division and that it is necessary and proper that such permit requirements be made uniform. That all of the aforementioned encumbrances are a burden on the transaction of commerce in the state and upon the efficient administration of government in the state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1997, No. 519, § 5: Mar. 13, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain areas of the state are bombarded by continual applications for permits to sell alcoholic beverages after the permit has been denied; that subsequent applications are by persons or entities that were a real party in interest in the original application and that it is necessary to have a cooling-off period between applications in such instances; that it is necessary for the tranquillity and stability of those neighborhoods to modify the law to establish more reasonable application procedures; and that this act will accomplish that purpose and should go into effect as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 70, § 4: Feb. 18, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act is necessary to prevent unfair competition; that this act is also necessary to ensure that those persons receiving retail liquor permits continue to abide by the spirit and intent of the law; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that, through the permitting process, citizens are protected from the illegal sale of alcoholic beverages. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 508, § 13(a): Oct. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 of this act become effective on October 1, 2017.”

3-4-201. Number of permits restricted — Definition.

(a)

The public policy of the state is to restrict the number of permits in this state to dispense vinous (except small farm wines), spirituous, or malt liquor.

(b)(1)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall determine whether public convenience and advantage will be promoted by issuing a permit and by increasing or decreasing the number of permits the board issues.

(2)

The number of permits issued by the board shall be restricted.

(c)

The board has the discretion to determine the number of permits to be granted in each county of this state or within the corporate limits of any municipality of this state and to determine the location and the persons to whom the permits shall be issued, under the following conditions:

(1)

The number of permits allowing the off-premises sale of vinous (except small farm wines), spirituous, or malt liquor in the State of Arkansas shall not exceed a ratio of one (1) permit for every seven thousand five hundred (7,500) population residing in the county or political subdivision of the county;

(2)(A)

The number of permits allowing the off-premises sale of vinous (except small farm wines), spirituous, or malt liquor in a county or political subdivision of the county that permits the sale shall not exceed a ratio of one (1) permit for every seven thousand five hundred (7,500) population residing in that county or political subdivision of the county.

(B)

Population of the county or political subdivision of the county shall:

(i)

Be determined according to the most recent federal decennial census; and

(ii)

Count all residents of the county or political subdivision of the county, including without limitation the residents of a dry political subdivision of a county;

(3)

A new permit that is issued in a county or political subdivision of the county following the most recent federal decennial census shall be issued under the following restrictions:

(A)

Additional permits may be issued at a ratio of one (1) permit for every additional seven thousand five hundred (7,500) population within the county or political subdivision of the county; and

(B)(i)

A qualified applicant may apply for a permit.

(ii)

Qualifications are to be set by the board and the board's determination of the public convenience and advantage;

(4)(A)

If it is determined that a county or political subdivision of the county is entitled to additional permits when warranted by the most recent federal decennial census, the board shall announce before the last date for applications the number of new permits, if any, that may be issued in the county or political subdivision of the county.

(B)

In the event that the most recent federal decennial census population figures decline in a county or political subdivision of the county:

(i)

Existing permits shall not be cancelled or revoked for the decline in population;

(ii)

The quota ratio shall not be applied to the county or political subdivision of the county until the population in the county or political subdivision of the county reaches a number equaling one (1) permit to every seven thousand five hundred (7,500) population; and

(iii)

A new permit shall not be issued in the county or political subdivision of the county until the population warrants.

(C)

A transfer of locations from one county to another county is not allowed.

(D)

If a holder of a permit for the sale of vinous (except small farm wines), spirituous, or malt liquor surrenders the permit in a county or political subdivision of the county where the ratio no longer meets the requirement of one (1) permit for every seven thousand five hundred (7,500) population, new applications shall not be accepted until that ratio is reestablished at a subsequent federal decennial census;

(5)(A)(i)

If a permit holder does not conduct business under a permit issued for a period of more than thirty (30) days, the permit shall be surrendered to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and shall be placed on inactive status.

(ii)

The permit may remain inactive for three (3) months.

(B)

To secure the return of the permit, the permit holder shall file with the director a written statement showing:

(i)

That all taxes and fees owing to the state have been paid;

(ii)

The reason for the suspension of business activities; and

(iii)

The date business activity will resume.

(C)(i)

The permit holder may petition the board for an extension of inactive status for an additional three-month period.

(ii)

The board may grant an initial extension upon a showing by the permit holder and a finding by the board that:

(a)

Business circumstances exist to justify an extension;

(b)

The delay to return to business was not due to mere deferral or inattention on the part of the permit holder; and

(c)

The inactive status should be extended.

(iii)

(a)

The permit holder may appeal to the board for a second extension of inactive status for an additional six-month period, but only upon a showing by the permit holder and a finding by the board that emergency circumstances exist to justify a final extension.

(b)

“Emergency circumstances” means delays in return to business that are beyond the control, planning, or foresight of the permit holder, including without limitation:

(1)

A delay due to a natural or man-made disaster;

(2)

The pending adjudication of a lawsuit;

(3)

A building construction problem; and

(4)

A contested or delayed insurance claim or settlement.

(D)

A permit remaining on inactive status for a period of more than twelve (12) months or which has not been granted an extension under this subdivision (c)(5) shall expire; and

(6)(A)

This section and §§3-4-202 and3-4-208, except with regard to a permit on inactive status for more than twelve (12) months after the provisions of subdivision (c)(5) of this section have become effective or a permit that has expired in accordance with subdivision (c)(5) of this section, do not divest any permit holder holding the permit on September 1, 2019, regardless of the quota ratio, of his or her permit.

(B)

In a county or political subdivision of the county that has a ratio lower than the permit quota ratio of one (1) permit for every seven thousand five hundred (7,500) population, the permit holder shall be allowed to continue under subdivision (c)(4)(B) of this section.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 1; 1937, No. 80, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 14106; Acts 1955, No. 360, § 1; 1983, No. 812, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-301; Acts 1991, No. 714, § 1; 1991, No. 1179, § 1; 1993, No. 779, § 2; 2013, No. 1068, § 1; 2019, No. 571, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (a), deleted “It is declared to be” preceding “The public”, substituted “is to restrict” for “that”, inserted “small farm” preceding “wines”, and deleted “shall be restricted” following “liquor”; rewrote (b) and (c); and, in (d), deleted “The provisions of” preceding “This section” and inserted “small farm” preceding “wines”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “the board issues” for “it issues” in (b)(1); rewrote (c); deleted (d); updated internal references; and made stylistic changes.

3-4-202. City and county licenses and taxes.

(a)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board in exercising its discretionary power shall give due regard to the ordinances and regulations of the counties and municipalities of this state.

(b)

All municipal corporations may license and tax the manufacture and sale of vinous (except wines), spirituous, or malt liquors by the permittees so authorized by the board. However, the municipal license fee shall not exceed an amount equal to one-half (½) of the license fee collected by the board for the State of Arkansas.

(c)

Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent the county court from licensing the sale and manufacture of vinous (except wines), spirituous, or malt liquors by the permittees so authorized by the board, provided that the premises permitted are located outside the limits of a municipal corporation but within the county in which the county court is located. However, the license fee collected by the county court shall not exceed the amount equal to one-half (½) of the license fee collected by the board for the State of Arkansas.

(d)

No county license fee shall be collected from any permittee where the premises permitted are located within the limits of a municipal corporation.

(e)

No permittee shall be required to pay both a city and a county license fee for the same premises permitted by the board.

(f)

Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent the prohibition of the manufacture and sale by means of local option elections as authorized by law.

(g)(1)

The city clerk or county clerk charged with the duty of collecting the license fee shall notify the board of the identity of retailers failing to comply with the provisions of this section.

(2)

The board shall then notify wholesale dealers to discontinue sales to the delinquent retailers.

(3)

When the license fee is paid, the appropriate clerk shall notify the board that the retailer has paid the fee.

(4)

The board shall notify wholesalers to resume sales to the retailers.

(5)

Any wholesaler who continues to sell to a retailer after notification from the board to discontinue the sales shall be subject, upon conviction, to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(h)

The provisions of this section shall apply only to applications for permits to dispense vinous (except wines), spirituous, or malt liquor filed with the board after July 4, 1983.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 1; 1937, No. 80, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 14106; Acts 1955, No. 360, § 1; 1983, No. 812, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-301.

Publisher's Notes.

For exclusion of wines, see Publisher's Notes to §3-4-201.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1935, No. 108, codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.

3-4-203. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning tax receipts as a prerequisite to issuance of a permit, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 606, § 10. The section was derived from Acts 1959, No. 40, § 1; 1961, No. 172, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-344.

3-4-204. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning when permits may not be issued, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 527, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 1967, No. 336, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-310.1.

3-4-205. Interest in other permits prohibited — Exceptions.

(a)

For purposes of this section, the term “vested permits” is defined as those multiple retail liquor permits which were lawfully issued to any person, firm, or corporation prior to July 19, 1971.

(b)(1)(A)

No retail liquor permit shall be issued, either as a new permit or as a replacement of an existing permit, to any person, firm, or corporation if the person, firm, or corporation has any interest in another retail liquor permit, regardless of the degree of interest.

(B)

A retail liquor permit shall apply only to one (1) location, and a person, firm, or corporation shall not be permitted to receive any direct or indirect financial benefit from the sale of liquor at any location other than the permitted location.

(2)

However, notwithstanding this prohibition, any retail liquor permits held by any person, firm, or corporation on July 19, 1971, which continue to be held by any person, firm, or corporation having an interest in more than one (1) retail liquor permit on August 13, 1993, shall be vested permits.

(c)(1)

Holders of vested permits may not sell, convey, assign, or devise any such interest in multiple retail liquor permitted businesses to any person or persons, firm, or corporation which, on the date of any such transfer, already has any ownership interest in a permitted retail liquor business.

(2)

However, holders of vested permits shall be allowed to sell, convey, assign, or devise any such interest in multiple retail liquor permitted businesses to any other person or persons, firm, or corporation, thereby creating an ownership interest in more than one (1) retail liquor permit to any such subsequent purchasers, assignees, or devisees without violating any of the provisions hereinabove.

(d)

A holder of a vested permit may brand each of the businesses that is operated under the vested permit with the same name or logo, or both.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 106, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-310.2; Acts 1993, No. 433, § 1; 2011, No. 70, § 1; 2015, No. 1142, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 433, § 2 provided:

“It is the intent of this act to grant to those holders of vested multiple retail liquor permits the same rights and privileges as holders of single retail liquor permits regarding the sale, conveyance, assignment or devise of such permitted businesses.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (b)(1)(B); and deleted “such” preceding “retail liquor permit” in (b)(2).

The 2015 amendment added (d).

3-4-206. Operation of retail liquor business near church or schoolhouse prohibited — Definitions.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Church” means a church and all immediately adjacent property owned or leased by the church that is used for church purposes; and

(2)(A)

“Schoolhouse” means:

(i)

A facility owned and operated by a public or private school or an open-enrollment charter school; and

(ii)

A public or private daycare facility licensed by the State of Arkansas.

(B)

“Schoolhouse” does not include a home school.

(b)(1)

No new permit to engage in the retail liquor business in this state may be issued by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for the location of any business situated within one thousand feet (1,000') of any church or schoolhouse property line.

(2)

No existing permit to engage in the retail liquor business in this state may be transferred to a location within one thousand feet (1,000') of any church or schoolhouse property line.

(3)

The distance specified in subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) of this section shall be measured by nearest property line point to nearest property line point.

(4)

Subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) of this section apply only to an application for a new permit or the transfer of an existing permit filed with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board after August 1, 2015.

(c)

If a preliminary inspection by personnel of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division indicates that a proposed location for a retail liquor business appears from any point to be situated between nine hundred feet (900') and one thousand one hundred feet (1,100') of a church or schoolhouse property line, the permit applicant shall submit to the division a survey of the location performed by a licensed surveyor before a permit is issued for the retail liquor business.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 699, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-345; Acts 2001, No. 1072, § 1; 2015, No. 1172, § 1; 2017, No. 491, § 1; 2019, No. 983, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendment added (c).

The 2019 amendment added the (a)(1) designation; added (a)(2); and made stylistic changes.